Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 47.1 Motor Vehicle Emissions Inspection Program

31-47.1-1.
Legislative findings.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

Air quality in Rhode Island does not meet the national and state ambient air quality standard for ozone;

Poor air quality has an adverse effect on the health of all Rhode Island residents, particularly the elderly, the very young and those with respiratory ailments;

Motor vehicle emissions account for a substantial amount of air pollution problems in the state;

There is a dramatic need to reduce motor vehicle emissions in Rhode Island;

The Clean Air Act Amendments of 1990 (42 U.S.C. § 7401 et seq.) mandates that the states formulate and implement individual programs to systematically improve ambient air quality, including a program to reduce emissions through the inspection and maintenance of motor vehicles;

Should Rhode Island fail to act in a timely manner to improve its ambient air quality pursuant to the Clean Air Act Amendments of 1990, notwithstanding the continued adverse effect air pollution will have on the environment and citizenry of the state, the United States department of transportation will withhold highway funding until compliance is attained, the United States environmental protection agency will withhold grants to support air pollution planning and control programs until compliance is attained, require new emissions be offset by emissions reductions at a ratio of two (2) to one, and will implement a motor vehicle emissions inspection program in the state. In addition, the citizens of the state of Rhode Island may seek injunctive relief under the provisions of the Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. § 7401 et seq.).

The general assembly enacted legislation mandating a centralized system for motor vehicle emissions inspections and maintenance during the January 1993 session;

The centralized motor vehicle emission inspection and maintenance program was never implemented;

A decentralized system for motor vehicle emission inspection is more desirable than a centralized system;

Designing, promulgating and implementing a decentralized system for motor vehicle emissions inspection and maintenance will improve air quality, protect the health of Rhode Islanders, assure compliance with the federal clean air act and allow the removal of sanctions imposed on the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 65, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 327, § 1.

31-47.1-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms have the following meanings:

“Authorized inspection and repair stations (AIRS)” means a facility which has been authorized by the department to conduct motor vehicle emissions inspections and re-inspections.

“Compliance certificate” means a written statement, instrument or device indicating that a motor vehicle complies with the standards and criteria for motor vehicle emissions inspection.

“Department” means the department of revenue.

“Motor vehicle” means every vehicle which is self-propelled and every vehicle which is propelled by electric power obtained from overhead trolley wires, but not operated upon rails, except vehicles moved exclusively by human power and motorized wheelchairs.

“Motor vehicle emissions inspection” means a test of the emissions of air contaminants from a motor vehicle and any visual and functional checks related to the emission of air contaminants from a motor vehicle conducted pursuant to this chapter.

“Waiver certificate” means a written statement, instrument or device indicating the requirement of compliance with the standards and criteria for motor vehicle emissions inspection for a particular motor vehicle has been waived.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 65, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 30; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 30.

31-47.1-3.
Inspection requirement.

Each motor vehicle subject to the provisions of this chapter shall be subject to a motor vehicle emissions inspection, conducted no more frequently than annually. Different classes of motor vehicles or model years may be subject to different inspection frequencies.

Motor vehicles subject to this chapter shall be determined by regulations, and shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, all 1975 and later model year light duty vehicles and light duty trucks up to and including eight thousand five hundred pounds (8,500 lbs.) gross vehicle weight rating.

Any motor vehicle which is inspected and found not to comply with the standards and criteria for motor vehicle emissions inspections must, within thirty (30) days of the inspection, be re-inspected and found to comply with the standards and criteria for motor vehicle emissions inspections, or have received a waiver certificate, or not be operated on the highways of the state.

Any certificate issued under this chapter shall always be carried in an easily accessible place in or about the vehicle for which the certificate was issued.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 152, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 165, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 65, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 327, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 47.

31-47.1-4.
Law enforcement.

Any law enforcement officer or designee of the director of the department of revenue whose duty it is to enforce laws related to motor vehicles, may demand and inspect any certificate issued under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 30; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 30.

31-47.1-5.
Exemptions.

The following motor vehicles shall be exempt from the requirements of this chapter:

A motor vehicle twenty-five (25) years or older.

Any class of motor vehicles that is exempted by regulation of the department because the vehicle presents prohibitive inspection problems or is inappropriate for inspection.

Motor vehicles operated exclusively by electric power.

New motor vehicles until twenty-four (24) months after their date of purchase or twenty-four thousand (24,000) miles, whichever occurs first.

Motor vehicles that are in compliance with an enhanced motor vehicle inspection program operated by another jurisdiction may be exempt upon the owner providing a current written certification of compliance, if the inspection program in that jurisdiction is approved by the United States environmental protection agency.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 65, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 327, § 1.

31-47.1-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 254, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1997, ch. 65, § 1, effective July 1, 1997.

31-47.1-7.
Motor vehicle emissions programs.

The department and the department of environmental management shall establish programs for the purpose of inspecting motor vehicles. It shall be the responsibility of the department to provide for the supervision of the operational aspects of emission inspection stations. It shall be the responsibility of the department of environmental management to provide for the environmental aspects of the motor vehicle emissions inspections. The programs, in total, shall be no less stringent than any performance standard for enhanced motor vehicle inspection/maintenance programs promulgated by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency and shall meet the requirements necessary for motor vehicles to qualify for the emission performance warranty provisions of the federal Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. § 7401 et seq.). The department and the department of environmental management may contract with private entities to assist the state in the administration of motor vehicle inspection programs.

The department shall promulgate rules and regulations for the issuance of certificates of compliance and certificates of waiver.

The department shall promulgate rules and regulations specifying the vehicles subject to the motor vehicle emissions inspection requirement.

The department shall conduct an on-road testing program. The department may require that vehicles it has reason to believe are not in compliance with the standards and criteria for motor vehicle emissions inspections submit to an out of cycle inspection at an AIRS and, if necessary, be brought into compliance as provided by this chapter.

The department shall assess the availability of adequate repair technician training and shall ensure that training is made available to interested individuals either through private or public facilities.

The department shall establish procedures to ensure that vehicles subject to either a voluntary emissions recall or a remedial plan pursuant to § 207(c)(42 U.S.C. § 7541(c)) of the federal Clean Air Act received the required repairs.

The department of environmental management shall promulgate rules and regulations establishing standards and criteria for motor vehicle emissions inspections, giving consideration to the levels of emissions necessary to achieve and maintain federal and state ambient air quality standards and the levels necessary to protect human health and the environment. The standards and criteria shall include, but not be limited to, a requirement to test the exhaust of motor vehicles for hydrocarbons, carbon monoxide and oxides of nitrogen. The standards and criteria may include, in lieu of the requirement to test the exhaust of model year 1996 and later motor vehicles, a requirement to inspect on-board diagnostic systems and to repair malfunctions or system deterioration identified by or affecting the systems. The standards and criteria may be different for different model years and types of vehicles. The department of environmental management shall promulgate regulations relative to: testing equipment specifications, quality assurance and quality control procedures for testing equipment, calibration gases, failure rates, emission standards, testing procedures, data collection and data analysis.

The department shall fund and establish a program for the quality assurance of motor vehicle emissions inspections with the state police and municipal police departments. This program may include a requirement for inspections of emissions inspection stations to determine compliance with all operational requirements.

The department of environmental management shall establish programs for public information and consumer protection.

The department of environmental management shall submit all appropriate aspects of the motor vehicle emissions inspection programs to the Environmental Protection Agency as revisions to the State Implementation Plan in accordance with the requirements of the federal Clean Air Act.

Rules and regulations promulgated by the department and the department of environmental management shall specify that the emissions inspection programs required by this chapter shall be a decentralized system of authorized inspection and repair stations and shall incorporate the inspection required by chapter 38 of title 31 of the general laws relating to motor vehicles.

Each AIRS must participate in any state sponsored program which provides emissions inspection equipment on a lease or purchase basis.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 65, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 327, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 201, § 1.

31-47.1-8.
Waiver certificate.

A motor vehicle which, after inspection or re-inspection, fails to comply with the standards and criteria for motor vehicle emissions inspections shall be eligible for a waiver certificate, provided that:

The cost of emission related repairs performed exceeds the repair cost limit. The cost of repairs may include the cost of emission related repairs made after the inspection or the cost of emission related repairs made up to sixty (60) days prior to the inspection. The cost of repairs shall not include any costs covered by an emission control performance warranty or the cost to repair or replace any emission control system or mechanism which has been removed, dismantled or rendered inoperative. The repair cost limit shall be two hundred and fifty dollars ($250) in 1999, 2000, and 2001 and shall be four hundred fifty dollars ($450) in 2002 and 2003. After 2003 the repair cost limit shall be four hundred and fifty dollars ($450) and shall be adjusted in January of each year by the percentage, if any, by which the Consumer Price Index for the preceding calendar year differs from the Consumer Price Index for 1989; or

A complete, documented physical and functional diagnosis and inspection, conducted by the department, shows that no additional emission related repairs are needed.

No person shall knowingly give false information to an AIRS or the department concerning the repair costs or repairs needed to bring a motor vehicle into compliance with the standards and criteria for motor vehicle emissions inspections.

Any person may perform repairs on a vehicle in order to meet the requirements of this chapter or chapter 38 of this title, except that the cost of repairs, including diagnosis, parts, and labor, to be applied to the repair cost limit must be performed by a certified repair technician. Only the cost of parts may be applied to the repair cost limit if repairs are performed by someone other than a certified repair technician.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 65, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 327, § 1.

31-47.1-9.
Prohibitions.

No person may issue a compliance certificate or a waiver certificate for a motor vehicle that has not been inspected in accordance with or is not in compliance with the standards and criteria for motor vehicle emissions inspections.

No person may alter, falsify or counterfeit a compliance certificate or a waiver certificate.

No person may materially alter or change any equipment or mechanism of a motor vehicle that has received a compliance certificate in a manner that the motor vehicle no longer complies with the standards and criteria for motor vehicle emissions inspections. This section shall not be construed as preventing the temporary alteration of equipment for the purpose of motor vehicle repair.

Any person under contract to the state to provide motor vehicle emission testing support service and/or any employee of such a contractor and the operator of an AIRS and/or an employee of an AIRS violating any of the provisions of this chapter may be subject to criminal penalties of a fine of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000), by imprisonment of not more than thirty (30) days, or by both fine and imprisonment for each violation.

Any person under contract to the state to assist the state in the administration of a motor vehicle emission inspection program and/or any employee of the contractor and the operator of an AIRS and/or an employee of an AIRS, or any person who is or acts as a garage repair person, violating any rule or regulation promulgated under the authority of this chapter shall be subject to a civil or administrative penalty of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this chapter or any rule or regulation promulgated under the authority of this chapter shall be subject to a civil or administrative penalty of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 65, § 2.

31-47.1-10.
Proceedings for enforcement.

The traffic tribunal shall have jurisdiction to enforce the criminal penalty provisions of this chapter.

The traffic tribunal shall have jurisdiction to enforce the provisions of any rule or regulation issued by the department pursuant to this chapter. The division of enforcement of the department of environmental management shall have jurisdiction to enforce the provisions of any rule or regulation issued by the department of environmental management pursuant to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 47.

31-47.1-11.
Fees.

Beginning in fiscal year 2015, a fee of fifty-five dollars ($55.00) is to be charged for each motor vehicle inspected. The amount of fees collected shall provide for the cost of the inspection, the costs of administering the motor vehicle emissions inspection program and other costs provided by law. The fee must be paid for each motor vehicle inspected at an emissions inspection station at the time of the inspection and is payable whether a compliance certificate, waiver certificate, or no certificate is issued. There shall be no fee charged for one reinspection of a vehicle that failed an initial inspection when the reinspection is conducted at the AIRS that conducted the initial inspection.

Of the fifty-five dollars ($55.00) fee, nineteen dollars ($19.00) shall be retained by the inspection station owner to cover the costs of performing the inspection. The remaining thirty-six dollars ($36.00) shall be remitted to the program manager. The program manager shall retain no more than four dollars ($4.00) of the fee and remit no less than thirty-two dollars ($32.00) for deposit in the Rhode Island highway maintenance account. Be it further provided that twenty dollars ($20.00) generated from the fee be deposited into the Rhode Island highway maintenance fund according to the schedule provided in subsection (b) of §

39-18.1-5

. The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sums as may be required to cover the costs of administering the program by the division of motor vehicles and the department of environmental management.

[Deleted by P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 21, § 6].

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 107; P.L. 1997, ch. 65, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 327, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 55, art. 27, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 8, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 34, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 21, § 6.